Alaska statutes. Title 3. Agriculture, Animals, and Food.
Article 2. Noncommercial Transfer of Seed and Community Seed Libraries.

History.

(§ 4 ch 87 SLA 2018)

Sec. 03.20.110.
Noncommercial transfer of seed.

An individual may give to or exchange with another individual for noncommercial use in the state seed that is otherwise legal to possess in the state.

History.

(§ 4 ch 87 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 4,
ch. 87, SLA 2018, which enacted this section, took effect on November 18, 2018.

Sec. 03.20.120.
Community seed libraries.

A person may establish a community seed library for individual giving or exchanging of seed that is intended for home, educational, charitable, or noncommercial use in the state and that is harvested from a plant grown

outside the state and imported into the state in compliance with AS

03.05.010(a)(5)

; or

in the state.

A person may give seed to or exchange seed with another person through a community seed library established under (a) of this section.

Seed given, exchanged, or offered for giving or exchanging under (b) of this section must be

packaged either in the original package or repackaged; and

except as provided in (d) of this section, labeled with the following information on each package:

the common name of the plant from which the seed derives;

the name and address of the community seed library;

the statement “Not authorized for commercial use and not classified, graded, or inspected by the State of Alaska”; and

if treated with a toxic substance, the statement “Treated seed—Not for consumption.”

A person who is giving, exchanging, or offering a seed package at a community seed library may satisfy the labeling requirement under (c)(2) of this section by displaying a sign near the packaged seed that identifies the seed and clearly states the information required under (c)(2) of this section.

History.

(§ 4 ch 87 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 4,
ch. 87, SLA 2018, which enacted this section, took effect on November 18, 2018.

Sec. 03.20.130.
Limitations.

A person may not give seed to or exchange seed with another person under AS

03.20.110

and

03.20.120

in an amount that, for each person who receives the seed, exceeds 100 pounds.

History.

(§ 4 ch 87 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 4,
ch. 87, SLA 2018, which enacted this section, took effect on November 18, 2018.

Sec. 03.20.140.
Online publication of noncommercial giving or exchanging of seed.

A person involved in noncommercial giving or exchanging of seed under AS

03.20.110

and

03.20.120

may register online with the department under AS

44.37.030(b)

and submit to the department information, including the person’s name, telephone number, and electronic mail address, and the location where the person gives or exchanges seed, for publication on the department’s Internet website.

History.

(§ 4 ch 87 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 4, ch. 87, SLA 2018, which enacted this section, took effect on November 18, 2018.

Sec. 03.20.150.
Applicability of other laws.

Nothing in AS

03.20.110

—

03.20.150

authorizes a person to

violate 7 U.S.C. 2321 — 2582 (Plant Variety Protection Act of 1970);

give, exchange, or receive a seed

from a plant that is regulated as

a controlled substance under AS 11.71 or a drug under AS 17.20; or

marijuana under AS 17.38; or

patented under 35 U.S.C. 161 — 164 (Plant Patent Act of 1930);

possess, give, or exchange seed that is considered to be noxious, invasive, or toxic under AS 03.05 or AS 44.37 or a regulation adopted under those chapters.

History.

(§ 4 ch 87 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 4,
ch. 87, SLA 2018, which enacted this section, took effect on November 18, 2018.